Utah statutes.
35A-4-507.   Authority to obtain money from state's account in federal unemployment trust fund -- Use and deposit.

(1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 35A-4-501 and 35A-4-506, the  department may requisition and receive from the state's account in the unemployment trust fund in the treasury of the United States the money standing to the state's credit as may, consistent with conditions for approval of this chapter under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, 26 U.S.C. 3301 et seq., be used for expenses of administering this chapter and to expend the money for that purpose.

(2)  Money requisitioned under Subsection (1) shall be deposited in the Special Administrative Expense Account created by Section 35A-4-506.



Amended by Chapter 342, 2011 General Session

